Louisiana, session 2026, HB310.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 780(B) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 780. Right to waive trial by jury
* * *
B.(1) The defendant shall exercise his right to waive trial by jury in
accordance with Article I, Section 17 of the Constitution of Louisiana. The waiver
shall be by written motion filed in the district court not later than forty-five days
prior to the date the case is set for trial. The motion shall be signed by the defendant
and shall also be signed by defendant's counsel unless the defendant has waived his
right to counsel.
(2) If a defendant files a motion pursuant to this Paragraph in a district court
with three or more judges who are assigned criminal matters within respective
divisions or sections, the case shall be randomly reassigned among the remaining
judges who are assigned criminal matters within all divisions or sections
immediately following the filing of the motion.
(3) Within ten days of service of notice of the defendant filing a written
motion to waive the jury, the prosecuting authority may file a written waiver of
reassignment, in which case the matter shall not be reassigned.
(4) When a defendant waives trial by jury in accordance with this Article and
the waiver results in reassignment, the filing of that waiver shall constitute an
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 310 ENROLLED
interruption of the time periods provided in Article 701, and the time periods shall
begin to run anew.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.